California statutes. Public Resources Code
 area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau, or in an unincorporated area, and the legal parcel or parcels are wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(ii) Within one-half mile walking distance to either a high-quality transit corridor or a major transit stop.

(iii) In a very low vehicle travel area.

(iv) Proximal to six or more amenities pursuant to paragraph (3) as of the date of submission of the application for the project.

(D) Parcels that are developed with urban uses adjoin at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the project site or at least three sides of
 a four-sided project site. For purposes of this paragraph, parcels that are only separated by a street or highway shall be considered to be adjoined.

(2) “High-quality transit corridor” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 21155.

(3) “Proximal” to an amenity means either of the following:

(A) Within one-half mile of any of the following amenities:

(i) A bus station.

(ii) A ferry terminal.

(B) Within one mile, or for a parcel in a rural area, as defined in Section 50199.21 of the Health and Safety Code, within two miles,
 of any of the following amenities:

(i) A supermarket or grocery store.

(ii) A public park.

(iii) A community center.

(iv) A pharmacy or drugstore.

(v) A medical clinic or hospital.

(vi) A public library.

(vii) A school that maintains a kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(4) “Vacant site” means a site without any houses, offices, buildings, or other significant improvements on it.

(5) (A) “Very low vehicle travel area” means an urbanized area, as designated by the United States Census Bureau, where the existing residential development generates vehicle miles traveled per capita that is below 85 percent of either regional vehicle miles traveled per capita or city vehicle miles traveled per capita.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “area” may include a travel analysis zone, hexagon, or grid.

(C) For the purposes of determining “regional vehicle miles traveled per capita” pursuant to subparagraph (A), a “region” is the entirety of incorporated and unincorporated areas governed by a multicounty or single-county metropolitan planning organization, or the entirety of the incorporated
 and unincorporated areas of an individual county that is not part of a metropolitan planning organization.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), this division does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The issuance of an entitlement by a public agency for an affordable housing project.

(2) An action to lease, convey, or encumber land owned by a public agency for an affordable housing project.

(3) An action to facilitate the lease, conveyance, or encumbrance of land owned or to be purchased by a public agency for an affordable housing project.

(4) Rezoning, specific plan amendments, or general plan amendments
 required specifically and exclusively to allow the construction of an affordable housing project.

(5) An action to provide financial assistance in furtherance of implementing an affordable housing project.

(c) Subdivision (b) applies if the action described in subdivision (b) requires the affordable housing project to meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The affordable housing project will be subject to a recorded California Tax Credit Allocation Committee regulatory agreement. This requirement does not apply to affordable housing projects that comply with all of the requirements of Section 65914.7 of the Government Code.

(2) The affordable housing
 project site can be adequately served by existing utilities or extensions.

(3) A public agency confirms all of the following:

(A) The project site satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (B) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4 of the Government Code.

(B) For a vacant site, the project site does not contain tribal cultural resources that could be affected by the development that were found pursuant to a consultation described in Section 21080.3.1 and the effects of which cannot be mitigated pursuant to the process described in Section 21080.3.2.

(C) (i) The development proponent has completed a phase
 I environmental assessment, as defined in Section 25319.1 of the Health and Safety Code. If a recognized environmental condition is found, the development proponent shall undertake a preliminary endangerment assessment, as defined in Section 25319.5 of the Health and Safety Code, prepared by an environmental assessor to determine the existence of any release of a hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure of future occupants to significant health hazards from any nearby property or activity.

(ii) If a release of a hazardous substance is found to exist on the site, the release shall be removed, or any significant effects of the release shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with current state and federal requirements.

(iii) If a potential for exposure to significant hazards from surrounding properties or activities is found to exist, the effects of the potential exposure shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with current state and federal requirements.

(D) For a project site where multifamily housing is not a permitted use, all of the following are met:

(i) None of the housing is located within 500 feet of a freeway, as defined in Section 332 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) None of the housing is located within 3,200 feet of a facility that actively extracts or refines oil or natural gas.

(iii) The project site is not within a very high fire hazard severity zone,
 as indicated on maps adopted by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4202 or as designated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 51179 of the Government Code.

(d) If a lead agency determines that an activity is not subject to this division pursuant to this section and determines to approve or carry out the activity, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and the county clerk of the county in which the activity will occur in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 503, Sec. 3.   (AB 1021)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.42.

(a) The following transportation projects are exempt from this division:

(1) U.S. Highway 101 interchange modification, adding southbound auxiliary lane and southbound mixed flow lane, from Interstate 280 to Yerba Buena Road, in Santa Clara County.

(2) Construct north and southbound high-occupancy vehicle lanes on I-805 from I-5 to Carroll Canyon Road, including construction of north-facing direct access ramps in San Diego County.

(3) State Route 99, Los Molinas rehabilitation and traffic calming, from Orange Street to Tehama Vine Road, in Tehama County.

(4) State Route 99, Island Park widening project, adding one mixed flow lane in each direction, from Ashlan Avenue to Grantlund Avenue, in Fresno County.

(5) State Route 99 median widening, adding one mixed flow lane in each direction, from State Route 120 west to 0.4 miles north of Arch Road, in Manteca in San Joaquin County.

(6) State Route 12 pavement rehabilitation and shoulder widening in San Joaquin County on Bouldin Island.

(7) State Route 91 widening, adding one mixed flow lane in each direction, from State Route 55 to Weir Canyon Road in Orange County.

(8) U.S. Highway 101 pavement rehabilitation and shoulder widening in San Luis Obispo County.

(b) An exemption provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to a transportation project if, on or after February 1, 2009, a lead agency changes the scope of that project from the manner in which the project is described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 6, Sec. 4.   Effective May 21, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.43.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Legislature reaffirms that the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) established longstanding legal requirements for the imposition of mitigation measures on projects.

(b) Specifically, CEQA requires that mitigation measures:

(1) Be feasible, meaning capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable timeframe, taking into account economic, environmental, legal, social, and technological factors.

(2) Be roughly proportional to the impacts of the project.

(3) Be supported by substantial evidence demonstrating a reasonable relationship, or “nexus,” between the mitigation and the impact it is intended to address.

(c) The Legislature further reaffirms that mitigation frameworks, including those aimed at addressing cumulative impacts such as vehicle miles traveled, must comply with these longstanding requirements that provide legal certainty, and equitable treatment of projects.

(d) Guidelines shall be developed in a manner that reflects and upholds these established principles.

(e) The Legislature further finds that existing guidance has been established in CEQA guidelines and subsequent technical advisories for addressing transportation impacts under CEQA. Impact analysis under CEQA is a dynamic process,
 continually informed by advancements in research, data, and practice. Currently, the Department of Transportation is developing updated methodologies for analyzing transportation impacts in rural settings, which are expected to be published on or before July 1, 2026. It is the intent of the Legislature that these ongoing efforts be integrated into relevant guidance for addressing transportation impacts that promote more effective practices statewide.

(f) It is the intent of Legislature that lead agencies ensure that vehicle miles traveled mitigation is achieved through a balanced approach by ensuring a project invests in multiple types of mitigation measures when working to reduce the vehicle miles traveled impacts of a project.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program serve as one optional strategy that a project applicant may use to mitigate a significant
 transportation impact under CEQA. The program established pursuant Section 21080.44 is intended to facilitate an existing category of mitigation, specifically, the development of vehicle miles traveled-efficient affordable housing or related infrastructure, by providing a streamlined and accessible mechanism through which applicants can contribute to eligible mitigation projects. This approach is consistent with established practices already used at the local and regional level across the state and provides project applicants an additional tool to support their mitigation efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 57.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.44.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(2) “Office” means the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation.

(3) “Region” means the territory of the metropolitan planning organization within which a project is located, or the territory of the regional transportation planning agency within which a project is located if the project is located outside of the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization.

(4) “Transit-Oriented Development
 Implementation Fund” means the fund created pursuant to Section 53561 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program” means the program established pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 53560) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) (A) If a lead agency determines that a project will have a significant transportation impact pursuant to the metrics adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 21099, the lead agency may mitigate the transportation impact to a less than significant level by helping to fund or otherwise facilitating vehicle miles traveled-efficient affordable housing or related infrastructure projects, provided the projects meet the requirements of mitigation measures contained within this division and Chapter 3 of Division 6 of Title 14 of the
 California Code of Regulations, including by contributing an amount, to be determined pursuant to the office’s guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d), to the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund for purposes of the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program.

(B) This section shall not preclude the lead agency’s use of other mitigation strategies, including, but not limited to, transportation demand management, transit improvements, active transportation infrastructure, road diets, or utilizing local or regional mitigation banks and exchanges.

(2) Moneys may be deposited into the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) beginning on or before July 1, 2026, as determined by the department.

(3) Consistent with paragraph (1), a project applicant may use the
 Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund as one optional strategy to mitigate a significant transportation impact under this division. The ultimate use of this mitigation option is subject to the discretion of the lead agency that retains full authority to determine the sufficiency of any proposed mitigation consistent with this division.

(c) (1) Moneys deposited into the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of awarding funding for affordable housing or related infrastructure projects, including infrastructure necessary for higher density uses, under the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program in the following priority order:

(A) First priority to affordable housing or related infrastructure projects in
 location-efficient areas, as defined in the office’s guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d), within the same region as the project.

(B) Second priority to affordable housing or related infrastructure projects within the same region as the project.

(C) (i) Third priority to affordable housing or related infrastructure projects in location-efficient areas that are outside of the originating region but within an adjacent region, provided the project site is located within a defined proximity radius established by the office issued pursuant to clause (ii).

(ii) The proximity radius shall be specified in the office’s guidance and may vary based on regional characteristics such as population density and travel patterns. The intent of this provision is to support projects in neighboring regions
 that offer similar vehicle miles traveled-reducing benefits due to the project’s location efficiency, including access to high-quality transit, jobs, and essential services.

(2) Affordable housing or related infrastructure projects for which funding was applied from other state funding programs, but was not awarded due to limited program resources, or was awarded but a financing gap still exists, may be considered for funding pursuant to this subdivision. The applications for funding for these affordable housing or related infrastructure projects shall be eligible for consideration through a streamlined and expedited administrative review process to accelerate delivery.

(3) For each award of funding for affordable housing or related infrastructure projects pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall, in partnership with the office, confirm the estimated reduction in vehicle
 miles traveled associated with the affordable housing or related infrastructure project using the methodology established in the office’s guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) On or before July 1, 2026, and at least once every three years thereafter, the office, in consultation with other state agencies, as appropriate, shall issue guidance related to the implementation of this section. This guidance shall include all of the following:

(1) A methodology for determining the amounts that are required to be contributed to the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) to mitigate the environmental impacts associated with vehicle miles traveled.

(2) A definition of location-efficient areas that reflects a reasonable nexus between the location of the transportation impact of
 the project and the location of the vehicle miles traveled-efficient affordable housing or related infrastructure project which shall consider the location efficient area’s consistency with an adopted sustainable communities strategy pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code, alternative planning strategy pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code, or other adopted regional growth plan intended to foster efficient land use.

(3) A process for validating a project’s vehicle miles traveled funding contribution, which shall be designed to provide certainty to the lead agency and project applicant that the contribution satisfies applicable mitigation requirements under this division for significant transportation impacts.

(4) A methodology for estimating the anticipated reduction in vehicle miles traveled associated with affordable housing or related infrastructure
 projects funded pursuant to subdivision (c). This methodology may consider existing methodologies, but shall be tailored to the specific purposes and structure of this section, including accounting for relevant factors influencing vehicle miles traveled reduction, including proximity to transit, job access, walkability, and the level of affordability, and the length of the affordability period, of the affordable housing or related infrastructure project.

(e) (1) (A) The initial guidance, which is required to be issued by the office on or before July 1, 2026, pursuant to subdivision (d), shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Before finalizing the initial guidance, the office shall
 provide public notice, make a draft version publicly available, and allow for a public comment period of at least 30 days. The office shall consider all comments received before issuing the final guidance.

(2) The office shall commence the regular rulemaking process for subsequent guidance on or before January 1, 2028, in compliance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(f) Beginning the year following the first distributions of funding pursuant to this section, the office, in consultation with the department, the Transportation Agency, and regions, shall evaluate the use of vehicle miles traveled mitigation resources allocated pursuant to this section. The evaluation shall assess the distribution of funds across project types, the effectiveness of
 supported projects in reducing vehicle miles traveled, the affordability of the housing units produced, and other relevant metrics that reflect program performance. Based on this assessment, the department, in consultation with the office and the Transportation Agency, may revise program guidelines to enhance outcomes.

(g) This section does not prevents a local agency from charging local impact fees based on vehicle miles traveled pursuant to the Mitigation Fee Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 66000), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 66010), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 66012), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 66016), and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 66020) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 58.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.45.

(a) This division does not apply to a new agricultural employee housing project that complies with Section 21159.22, meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (i) of Section 17021.8 of the Health and Safety Code, and that is any of the following:

(1) Funded by the Joe Serna, Jr. Farmworker Housing Grant Program (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 50515.2) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) Funded by the Office of Migrant Services within
 the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(3) Funded by a local government.

(4) Owned or operated and funded by a public or nonprofit entity, or that receives state, federal, or local public funding.

(b) This division does not apply to a project consisting exclusively of the repair or maintenance of an existing farmworker housing project.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21080.44 (as added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 650, Sec. 8.   (SB 158)   Effective October 11, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.46.

(a) Without limiting any other statutory exemption or categorical exemption, this division does not apply to the adoption of an ordinance by a city, county, or city and county to limit or prohibit the drilling of new or deeper groundwater wells, or to limit or prohibit increased extractions from existing groundwater wells, through stricter conditions on the issuance of well permits or changes in the intensity of land use that would increase demand on groundwater.

(b) (1) This section shall remain operative until July 1, 2017, or so long as the state of emergency due to drought conditions declared by the Governor in the proclamation of a state of emergency issued on January 17,
 2014, remains in effect, whichever is later.

(2) This section is repealed on January 1 of the year following the date on which this section becomes inoperative.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), this section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) The issuance of any permit for a new or deeper groundwater well by a city, county, or city and county.

(2) The adoption of any ordinance affecting or relating to new residential, commercial, institutional, or industrial projects or any mix of these uses, or any change in the intensity or use of land for these purposes, if that project or change in use requires approval by a city, county, or city and county. Nor does this section apply to the adoption of any ordinance that would limit or
 prohibit new or deeper groundwater wells, or increased extraction from existing groundwater wells, that may be needed to serve these projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 8.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.   Inoperative on July 1, 2017, or later date, as prescribed in subd. (b).   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.47.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community water system” means a public water system that serves at least 15 service connections used by yearlong residents or regularly serves at least 25 yearlong residents within the area served by the public water system.

(2) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with an annual median household income that is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income.

(3) “Inadequate onsite sewage treatment system” has the same meaning as defined in Section
 13288 of the Water Code.

(4) “Nontransient noncommunity water system” means a public water system that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least 25 of the same persons more than six months per year.

(5) “Onsite sewage treatment system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 13290 of the Water Code.

(6) (A) “Project” means
 either of the following:

(i) A project that consists solely of the installation, repair, or reconstruction of one or more of the following:

(I) Drinking water groundwater wells with a maximum flow rate of up to 250 gallons per minute.

(II) Drinking water treatment facilities with a footprint of less than 2,500 square feet that are not located in an environmentally sensitive area.

(III) Drinking water storage tanks with a capacity of up to 250,000 gallons.

(IV) Booster pumps and hydropneumatic tanks.

(V) Pipelines of less than three miles in length in a road right-of-way or up to seven miles in length in a road right-of-way when the project is required to address threatened or current drinking water violations.

(VI) Water service lines.

(VII) Minor drinking water system appurtenances, including, but not limited to, system and service meters, fire hydrants, water quality sampling stations, valves, air releases and vacuum break valves, emergency generators, backflow prevention devices, and appurtenance enclosures.

(ii) A project to provide sewer service to a
 disadvantaged community served by one or more inadequate sewage treatment systems.

(B) “Project” does not include either of the following categories of projects:

(i) Facilities that are constructed primarily to serve irrigation or future growth.

(ii) Facilities that are used to dam, divert, or convey surface water.

(7) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(8) “Public water system” means a system for the provision of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances that has 15 or more service connections or regularly serves at least 25 individuals daily at least 60 days out of the year, and shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(A) Any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under the control of, and used primarily in connection with, the public water system.

(B) Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under the control of the operator of the public water system, but that are used primarily in connection with the public water system.

(C) Any system for the provision of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances that treats water on behalf of one or more public water systems for the purpose of rendering it safe for human consumption.

(9) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(10) “Small community water system” means a community water system that serves no more than 3,300 service connections or a yearlong population of no more than 10,000 persons.

(11) “Small disadvantaged community water system” means either a small community water system that serves one or more disadvantaged communities or a nontransient noncommunity water system that primarily serves one or more schools that serve one or more disadvantaged communities.

(12) “State small water system” means a system for the provision of piped water to a disadvantaged community for human consumption that serves at least 5, but not more than 14, service connections and does not regularly serve drinking water to more than an average of 25 individuals daily for more than 60 days out of the year.

(b) (1) This division does not apply to a project that meets the requirements of subdivision (c) and subdivision (d) or (e), as appropriate, and that primarily benefits a small disadvantaged community water system or a state small water system in any of the following ways:

(A) Improving the small disadvantaged community water system’s or state small water system’s water
 quality, water supply, or water supply reliability.

(B) Encouraging water conservation.

(C) Providing drinking water service to existing residences within a disadvantaged community, a small disadvantaged community water system, or a state small water system where there is evidence that the water exceeds maximum contaminant levels for primary or secondary drinking water standards or where the drinking water well is no longer able to produce an adequate supply of safe drinking water.

(2) Before determining a project is exempt under this section, the lead agency shall contact the State Water Resources Control Board to determine whether claiming the exemption under this section will affect the ability of the small disadvantaged community water system or the state small water system to receive federal financial assistance
 or federally capitalized financial assistance.

(c) The project meets all of the following:

(1) Does not affect wetlands
 as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993), or an environmentally sensitive habitat area within the coastal zone, as defined in Section 30107.5.

(2) Unusual circumstances do not exist that would cause a significant effect on the environment.

(3) Is not located on a hazardous waste site that is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(4) Does not have the potential to cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of a historical resource.

(5) The construction impacts are fully mitigated consistent with applicable law.

(6) The cumulative impact of
 successive reasonably anticipated projects of the same type as the project, in the same place, over time, is not significant.

(d) (1) For a project undertaken by a public agency that is exempt from this division pursuant to this section, except as provided in paragraph (2), an entity shall not be prequalified or shortlisted or awarded a contract by the public agency to perform any portion of the project unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the public agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The public
 agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the public agency before January 1, 2021.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all of its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(e) For a project undertaken by a private entity that is exempt from this division pursuant to this section, the project applicant shall do both of the following:

(1) Certify to the lead agency that either of the following is true:

(A) The entirety of the project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(B) If the project is not in its entirety a public work, all construction workers employed in the execution of the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the project is subject to this subparagraph, then, for those portions of the project that
 are not a public work, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The project applicant shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(ii) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(iii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (III), all contractors and subcontractors shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided by that section.

(II) Except as provided in subclause (III), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(III) Subclauses (I) and (II) do not apply if all contractors and
 subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(iv) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing shall not apply if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker. The requirement to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.

(2) Certify to the lead agency that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all
 construction work on the project. All of the following requirements shall apply to the project:

(A) The applicant shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project.

(B) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the applicant shall provide to the lead agency, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. A monthly report provided to the lead agency pursuant to this clause shall be a public record under
 the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection. An applicant that fails to provide a monthly report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided. Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor
 Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(f) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(g) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1,
 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 9.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.48.

(a) This division does not apply to a project, as defined in Section 21080.47, that is a community water system that is funded pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 (Division 50 (commencing with Section 90000)) or the State Water Resources Control Board’s Safe and Affordable Funding for Equity and Resilience program that does not otherwise include any construction activities if the project does both of the following:

(1) Results in long-term net benefits to climate resiliency, biodiversity, and sensitive species recovery.

(2) Includes procedures and ongoing management for the protection of the
 environment.

(b) A project exempt from this division pursuant to this section remains subject to all other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations and shall not weaken or violate any applicable environmental or public health standards.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 10.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.49.

This division does not apply to any of the following wildfire risk reduction projects, if the project is in compliance with all other applicable laws, ordinances, and zoning requirements:

(a) A project consisting of a prescribed fire or fuel reduction to reduce wildfire risk by reestablishing the fire return interval appropriate to the ecosystem for biodiversity or other benefits, excluding projects located on coastal sage scrub habitat or any other sensitive habitat. In order to qualify for the exemption established pursuant to this subdivision, all of the following requirements shall be met:

(1) The project shall not exceed 50 contiguous acres and shall be located within one-half mile of a
 subdivision of 30 or more dwelling units.
